New Jersey, session 222, A1058.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Commissioner of Community Affairs shall review and amend the State Uniform Construction Code requirements concerning new and existing parking structures to address the increased weight imposed upon those structures due to electric vehicle occupancy. a.    The commissioner shall study, develop, and implement code requirements for new parking structures, which shall include, but not be limited to: (1)  requirements for the increased weight of electric vehicles; (2)  new installation codes for electric vehicle chargers; (3)  distributing electric vehicle parking spaces throughout the parking structure for the reduction of load intensity; (4)  an analysis of common parking structure construction types to determine whether the parking structure could withstand an increased load due to electric vehicles; and (5)  establishing a minimum of 10 percent electric vehicle parking spaces in new parking structures. b.    The commissioner shall study, develop, and implement code requirements for existing parking structures, which shall include, but not be limited to: (1)  a review of existing parking structure load requirements; (2)  a process for monitoring, measuring, and documenting parking structure performance with increased electric vehicle occupancy; (3)  publishing detailed example analyses and strengthening projects as models for assessment and upgrade; and (4)  requirements for the owners of parking structures, which the department deems unsound or structurally deficient due to increased electric vehicle occupancy, to develop a remediation plan, including a timeline for coming into compliance within 90 days of the notice of deficiency, or the department shall be empowered to close the parking structure until the owner brings the parking structure into compliance. 2.    The Commissioner of Community Affairs shall, in accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), adopt rules and regulations as necessary to implement the provisions of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 3. This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month next following the date of enactment, except that the Commissioner of Community Affairs may take anticipatory action necessary to effectuate the provisions of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).